Utah statutes.
48-2e-403.   Limited partnership liable for general partner's actionable conduct.

(1)  A limited partnership is liable for loss or injury caused to a person, or for a penalty incurred, as a result of a wrongful act or omission, or other actionable conduct, of a general partner acting in the ordinary course of activities and affairs of the limited partnership or with the actual or apparent authority of the limited partnership.

(2)  If, in the course of a limited partnership's activities and affairs or while acting with actual or apparent authority of the limited partnership, a general partner receives or causes the limited partnership to receive money or property of a person not a partner, and the money or property is misapplied by a general partner, the limited partnership is liable for the loss.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

